Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.420

Urban agriculture zone.

(1) A code city may, by ordinance, establish an urban agriculture zone within the boundaries of the code city.

(2) To establish an urban agriculture zone, the code city must conduct at least one public hearing on the question of whether to establish the urban agriculture zone.

(3) An ordinance adopted pursuant to this section must not prohibit the use of structures that support agricultural activity including, without limitation, apiaries, toolsheds, greenhouses, produce stands, and instructional spaces.

[ 2019 c 353 s 16.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 353: See note following RCW 43.23.300.